Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-241
Extraterritorial airport; state or governmental agency; powers.

This state or any governmental agency of this state having any powers with respect to planning, establishing, acquiring, developing, constructing, enlarging, improving, maintaining, equipping, operating, regulating, or protecting airports or air navigation facilities within this state, may exercise those powers within any state or jurisdiction adjoining this state, subject to the laws of that state or jurisdiction.

Laws 1949, c. 1, § 2, p. 55.